FBReader.Hyphen/Resources/en.pattern
ud5est
dev3il
de3str
ud3ied
ud3ies
des3ti
de2s5o
at3ego
vis3it
de4nar
demor5
at3en 
uen4te
uer4il
de5mil
at3era
ugh3en
3demic
ater5n
uil5iz
deli4e
de5com
de4cil
decan4
de4bon
v3io4r
deb5it
4dativ
2d3a4b
at3est
u5lati
cu4tie
5ulche
ul3der
cuss4i
cu5ria
ath5em
3cultu
a5then
ul3ing
ul5ish
ul4lar
4vi4na
ul4lis
cu5ity
ctim3i
c4ticu
uls5es
c5tant
ultra3
ct5ang
cros4e
crop5o
cro4pl
5criti
ath5om
um4bly
cre3at
5vilit
umor5o
at5i5b
5crat 
cras5t
coro3n
cop3ic
com5er
col3or
un5ish
co3inc
5clare
at3itu
unt3ab
at5rop
un4tes
cit3iz
4cisti
4cista
4cipic
c5ing 
cin3em
3cinat
uper5s
5vides
up3ing
ci2a5b
5chini
5vided
upt5ib
5vide 
at4tag
4ch1in
ch3ers
ch3er 
ch5ene
3chemi
che5lo
ure5at
ur4fer
cheap3
vi5ali
at3ura
vet3er
4ch3ab
c5e4ta
au5sib
3cessi
ves4te
ce5ram
2cen4e
4ceden
ccou3t
urs5er
ur5tes
ur3the
aut5en
ur4tie
cav5al
4cativ
ave4no
ver3th
car5om
ca5per
can4ty
can3iz
can5is
can4ic
us4lin
3verse
cal4la
ver3ie
ca3lat
ca5den
cab3in
3butio
buss4e
bus5ie
bunt4i
v4eres
uten4i
4u1t2i
v3eren
u3tine
ut3ing
v4erel
broth3
5u5tiz
bound3
4b1ora
bon5at
5vere 
bom4bi
bol3ic
blun4t
5blesp
blath5
av3era
v5enue
bi3ogr
bi5net
ven3om
2v1a4b
vac5il
bi3liz
bet5iz
be5str
va5lie
be5nig
bbi4na
bas4si
va5niz
bari4a
av5ern
barbi5
av5ery
vel3li
azi4er
avi4er
 dri5v4
ban5dag
var5ied
bina5r4
3bi3tio
3bit5ua
 ad4der
ution5a
uti5liz
ver5enc
buf4fer
us5tere
vermi4n
call5in
cast5er
cas5tig
ccompa5
z3o1phr
os5itiv
5chanic
uri4fic
o5stati
5chine 
y5che3d
upport5
4v3iden
5cific 
un4ter 
at5omiz
4oscopi
otele4g
5cratic
u4m3ing
v3i3liz
4c3reta
ul4li4b
cul4tis
cur5a4b
4c5utiv
a5terna
uiv4er 
del5i5q
dem5ic 
de4mons
denti5f
dern5iz
di4lato
u4b5ing
drag5on
5drupli
uar5ant
5a5si4t
ec5essa
wo4k1en
ec5ifie
e4compe
ar5inat
e4f3ere
tro5phe
wide5sp
5tricia
tri5ces
efor5es
e4fuse 
oth5esi
ar5dine
ar4chan
tra5ven
trac4te
trac4it
ar5ativ
a5ratio
el5ativ
or5est 
ar5adis
el5ebra
ton4ali
e4l5ic 
wea5rie
el5igib
e4l3ing
to5crat
em5igra
em3i3ni
emoni5o
ench4er
wave1g4
a4pilla
voice1p
tion5ee
will5in
ent5age
4enthes
vaude3v
till5in
ep5reca
ep5ti5b
va6guer
4erati 
tho5riz
thor5it
5thodic
er5ence
5ternit
teri5za
ter5ies
ten4tag
e4sage 
e4sages
e4sert 
an5est 
e4serts
e4serva
es5iden
es5igna
esis4te
es5pira
es4si4b
tal4lis
estruc5
e5titio
ounc5er
xe4cuto
ta5bles
et5itiv
a4m5ato
a4matis
5stratu
4f3ical
5a5lyst
4ficate
fill5in
stern5i
sspend4
gani5za
squal4l
a4lenti
4g3o3na
s5ophiz
5sophic
xpecto5
5graph 
or5ange
uri4al 
4graphy
4gress 
smol5d4
hang5er
h5a5niz
harp5en
har5ter
hel4lis
hith5er
hro5niz
iam5ete
ia4tric
ic4t3ua
scour5a
u2r1al 
5scin4d
over4ne
scan4t5
5sa3tio
u5do3ny
 ven4de
 under5
ty2p5al
 anti5s
ylla5bl
iner4ar
turn3ar
i5nite 
5initio
insur5a
ion4ery
iphras4
 tim5o5
 ten5an
 sta5bl
rtroph4
 se5rie
iq3ui3t
5i5r2iz
is5itiv
iso5mer
4istral
5i5tick
i2t5o5m
tsch3ie
 re5mit
tro3fit
i4v3er 
i4vers 
ros5per
 pe5tit
iv3o3ro
 ped5al
ro5n4is
 or5ato
4jestie
rom5ete
 muta5b
k5iness
4lateli
tr4ial 
 mist5i
 me5ter
r4ming 
lev4er 
 mar5ti
lev4era
lev4ers
 mag5a5
liar5iz
5ligate
rit5ers
 lat5er
rit5er 
r5ited 
 im5pin
ri3ta3b
link5er
 hon5ey
5litica
 hero5i
or5aliz
 hand5i
rip5lic
 gen3t4
tolo2gy
lloqui5
 con5gr
t1li2er
bad5ger
4operag
 eu4ler
tho3don
ter2ic 
 ar4tie
 ge4ome
 ge5ot1
 he3mo1
 he3p6a
 he3roe
 in5u2t
para5bl
5tar2rh
t1a1min
talk1a5
ta3gon 
par5age
 aster5
 ne6o3f
 noe1th
styl1is
 poly1s
5pathic
 pre1am
pa4tric
l3o3niz
 sem4ic
 semid6
 semip4
 semir4
5ommend
 semiv4
lea4s1a
 spin1o
om5etry
spher1o
 to6pog
lo4rato
spe3cio
3s2pace
so2lute
 we2b1l
 re1e4c
a5bolic
om5erse
af6fish
side5sw
anal6ys
ano5a2c
side5st
l5ties 
5lumnia
sid2ed 
anti1re
shoe1st
scy4th1
s4chitz
sales5w
sales3c
at6tes 
augh4tl
au5li5f
om5atiz
ol5ogiz
o5litio
rev5olu
re5vert
re5vers
bi5d2if
bil2lab
 earth5
pera5bl
ro1tron
ro3mesh
blan2d1
blin2d1
blon2d2
bor1no5
ro1bot1
re4ti4z
r5le5qu
peri5st
per4mal
but2ed 
but4ted
cad5e1m
oist5en
re5stal
ress5ib
chie5vo
cig3a3r
oint5er
4matiza
riv1o1l
cous2ti
cri3tie
5phisti
 be5sto
og5ativ
o2g5a5r
r3a3dig
m4b3ing
re4posi
r4en4ta
de4als 
od5ucts
quasis6
quasir6
re5fer 
p5trol3
rec5oll
dic1aid
dif5fra
3pseu2d
r5ebrat
5metric
2d1lead
2d1li2e
pro2g1e
pre1neu
od5uct 
octor5a
poin3ca
me5trie
m5i5lie
pli5nar
para3me
min5gli
m5ingly
pi4grap
pal6mat
mis4er 
m5istry
eo3grap
orth1ri
op1ism 
 but4ti
o3norma
onom1ic
feb1rua
fermi1o
 de4moi
o5a5les
odit1ic
odel3li
rb5ing 
gen2cy 
n4t3ing
mo5lest
ration4
get2ic 
4g1lish
obli2g1
mon4ism
nsta5bl
mon4ist
g2n1or 
nov3el3
ns5ceiv
no1vemb
mpa5rab
no4rary
mula5r4
nom1a6l
put4tin
put4ted
n5o5miz
 cam4pe
nag5er 
nge5nes
h2t1eou
n1dieck
2ne1ski
ifac1et
ncour5a
ne3back
mono1s6
mono3ch
mol1e5c
pref5ac
3milita
pre5ten
ith5i2l
nge4n4e
nd5est 
 capa5b
je1re1m
ma1la1p
ly5styr
1kovian
 car5ol
prin4t3
lo2ges 
l2l3ish
prof5it
1s2tamp
lead6er 
url5ing 
ces5si5b
ch5a5nis
1le1noid
lith1o5g
 chill5i
lar5ce1n
ym5e5try
ch5iness
ation5ar
load4ed 
load6er 
la4c3i5e
lth5i2ly
neg5ativ
1lunk3er
writ6er 
wrap3aro
trav5es5
1ke6ling
a5ramete
man3u1sc
mar1gin1
ap5illar
5tistica
medio6c1
me3gran3
i1tesima
3mi3da5b
ves1tite
mil2l1ag
v1er1eig
mi6n3is 
1verely 
e4q3ui3s
5taboliz
g5rapher
5graphic
mo5e2las
infra1s2
mon4ey1l
im3ped3a
mo4no1en
ab5o5liz
 cor5ner
moth4et2
m1ou3sin
m5shack2
ppo5site
mul2ti5u
ab5it5ab
imenta5r
ignit1er
nato5miz
hypo1tha
ni5ficat
uad1ratu
4n5i4an 
ho6r1ic 
ua3drati
5nologis
hite3sid
in5dling
 trib5ut
in5gling
nom5e1no
n1o1mist
mpos5ite
non1i4so
 re5stat
tro1p2is
trof4ic 
g2noresp
gnet1ism
5glo5bin
lem5atic
flow2er 
fla1g6el
ntrol5li
fit5ted 
treach1e
tra1vers
l5i5tics
o3mecha6
 for5mer
 de5riva
ti2n3o1m
e3spac6i
2t3i4an 
thy4l1an
tho1k2er
 eq5ui5t
o4s3pher
tha4l1am
t3ess2es
3ter1gei
ou3ba3do
tele1r6o
oxi6d1ic
eli2t1is
onspir5a
par4a1le
ed1uling
ea4n3ies
oc5ratiz
tch3i1er
 kil2n3i
pi2c1a3d
pli2c1ab
t6ap6ath
drom3e5d
 le6ices
drif2t1a
 me4ga1l
1prema3c
dren1a5l
pres2pli
pro2cess
 met4ala
3do5word
1syth3i2
 non1e2m
 post1am
pto3mat4
rec5ompe
pu5bes5c
strib5ut
qu6a3si3
1stor1ab
 sem6is4
star3tli
qui3v4ar
r1abolic
 sph6in1
de5clar1
2d3alone
radi1o6g
s3qui3to
sports3w
sports3c
ra5n2has
cro5e2co
r3bin1ge
spokes5w
spi2c1il
 te3legr
croc1o1d
 un3at5t
 dictio5
cat1a1s2
buss4ing
bus6i2es
bus6i2er
bo2t1u1l
ro5e2las
1s2pacin
b1i3tive
ma5rine 
r3pau5li
 un5err5
r5ev5er 
 vi2c3ar
back2er 
ma5chine
si5resid
5losophy
an3ti1n2
sca6p1er
sca2t1ol
ar2range
sep3temb
1sci2utt
se3mes1t
ar3che5t
sem1a1ph
re4t1ribu
uto5matic
l3chil6d1
a4pe5able
1lec3ta6b
as5ymptot
yes5ter1y
l5mo3nell
5losophiz
lo1bot1o1
c5laratio
ba6r1onie
rse1rad1i
ro5epide1
co6ph1o3n
scrap4er 
rec5t6ang
re2c3i1pr
lai6n3ess
1lum5bia 
3lyg1a1mi
ec5ificat
ef5i5nite
s2s3i4an 
1ki5netic
japan1e2s
med3i3cin
irre6v3oc
de2c5lina
o3les3ter
mil5li5li
strat1a1g
quain2t1e
ep5etitio
stu1pi4d1
v1oir5du1
su2per1e6
 mi1s4ers
3di1methy
 mim5i2c1
i5nitely 
5maph1ro1
5moc1ra1t
moro6n5is
du1op1o1l
 ko6r1te1
n3ar4chs 
phi2l3ant
 ga4s1om1
teach4er 
parag6ra4
o6v3i4an 
oth3e1o1s
n3ch2es1t
o5tes3tor
o5test1er
or5tively
5nop5o5li
ha2p3ar5r
ttrib1ut1
 eth1y6l1
e2r3i4an 
5nop1oly 
graph5er 
5eu2clid1
o1lo3n4om
trai3tor1
 ratio5na
5mocratiz
 rav5en1o
se1mi6t5ic
3tro1le1um
5sa3par5il
oli3gop1o1
am1en3ta5b
ath3er1o1s
3slova1kia
3s2og1a1my
o3no2t1o3n
c2tro3me6c
1cu2r1ance
5noc3er1os
th1o5gen1i
h3i5pel1a4
nfi6n3ites
 ever5si5b
s2s1a3chu1
d1ri3pleg5
 ta5pes1tr
proc3i3ty 
s5sign5a3b
3rab1o1loi
itin5er5ar
waste3w6a2
mi1n2ut1er
de3fin3iti
quin5tes5s
vi1vip3a3r
pseu3d6o3f2
s2t1ant5shi
mi1n2ut1est
pseu3d6o3d2
5tab1o1lism
po3lyph1ono
phi5lat1e3l
travers3a3b
schro1ding1
2g1o4n3i1za
t1ro1pol3it
3trop1o5lis
3trop1o5les
le3g6en2dre
eth1y6l1ene
or4tho3ni4t
3ra4m5e1triz
1e6p3i3neph1
